Utah statutes.
36-12-16.   Legislative directors -- Authority to obtain assistance.
Within budgetary limitations, the legislative directors shall have authority
to obtain consulting help and professional outside contract assistance and fix
the fees paid according to rates and schedules consistent with those generally
accepted within the appropriate profession.
